Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2176.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) All private schools shall be subject to a student
attendance multiplier factor for the purpose of determining such school's
classification for activities regulated by the association described in K.S.A.
72-7114, and amendments thereto. A private school's student attendance
shall be multiplied by such school's multiplier factor as determined under
subsection (e), and the resultant product shall be such school's student
attendance for the purpose of school classification. A private school shall
not be classified higher than one class above its student attendance
classification as determined without the application of its multiplier factor.
The multiplier factor shall be used to determine a school's classification for
all activities, except that a school's multiplier factor shall not be used to
change a school's classification from six-person football to eight-person
football or from eight-person football to 11-person football. A private
school's change in classification due to the application of a multiplier
factor shall not be appealable.
(b) (1) A private school that has won five or more state
championships during the immediately preceding five school years shall
be subject to a championship multiplier factor. The championship
multiplier factor shall be determined as follows:
(A) For a school that has won at least five such state championships
but not more than nine such state championships, the championship
multiplier factor shall be 1.15; and
(B) for a school that has won 10 or more such state championships,
the championship multiplier factor shall be 1.3.
(2) The number of state championships won is determined by
calculating the cumulative number of state championships in all team
activities won by teams from such school during the immediately
preceding five school years.
(c) (1) If a private school is subject to a championship multiplier

HB 2176 2
factor as determined under subsection (b), then such private school shall
also be subject to a geographic population multiplier factor. The
geographic population multiplier factor shall be determined as follows:
(A) For a school located within the school attendance territory of a
public school that is classified as either class 5A or class 6A, the
geographic population multiplier factor shall be 0.3;
(B) for a school located within the school attendance territory of a
public school that is classified as either class 3A or class 4A, the
geographic population multiplier factor shall be 0.15; and
(C) for a school located within the school attendance territory of a
public school that is classified as either class 1A or class 2A, the
geographic population multiplier factor shall be 0.
(2) The geographic location of a private school shall be determined
by the physical address of such school.
(d) (1) If a private school is subject to a championship multiplier
factor as determined under subsection (b), then such private school shall
also be subject to a socio-economic population multiplier factor. The
socio-economic population multiplier factor shall be determined as
follows:
(A) For a school that has not more than 20% of its students receiving
free or reduced meals under the national school lunch act, the socio-
economic population multiplier factor shall be 0.15; and
(B) for a school that has more than 20% of its students receiving free
or reduced meals under the national school lunch act, the socio-economic
population multiplier factor shall be 0.
(2) If a private school does not collect or report student data for
determining eligibility for free or reduced meals, then such school shall be
deemed to have 0% of such school's students receiving free or reduced
meals.
(e) A private school's multiplier factor shall be determined by
calculating the sum of the multiplier factors determined under subsections
(b), (c) and (d).
(f) As used in this section:
(1) "Private school" means any school that offers any of the grades
nine through 12 and that is not operated by a unified school district; and
(2) "public school" means any school operated by a unified school
district that offers any of the grades nine through 12.
(g) This section shall expire on June 30, 2030.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 72-7114 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
7114. (a) Any association with a majority of the high schools of the state
as members and the purpose of which association is the statewide
regulation, supervision, promotion and development of any of the
activities defined in K.S.A. 72-7117, and amendments thereto, and in

HB 2176 3
which any public high school of this state may participate directly or
indirectly shall:
(1) On or before September 1 of each year make a full report of its
operation for the preceding calendar year to the state board of education.
The report shall contain a complete and detailed financial statement under
the certificate of a certified public accountant.;
(2) file with the state board a copy of all reports and publications
issued from time to time by such association.;
(3) be governed by a board of directors. which shall exercise the
legislative authority of the association and shall establish policy for the
association.;
(4) submit to the state board of education, for its approval or
disapproval prior to adoption, any amendments, additions, alterations or
modifications of its articles of incorporation or bylaws. If any articles of
incorporation, bylaws or any amendment, addition or alteration thereto is
disapproved by the state board of education, the same shall not be
adopted.;
(5) Establish a system for the classification of member high schools
according to student attendance. and a multiplier factor as determined
under section 1, and amendments thereto;
(6) be subject to the provisions of the Kansas open meetings law. act;
and
(7) be subject to the provisions of the open records law act.
(b) (1) The board of directors shall consist of not less than 60
members as follows:
(A) At least eight directors shall be members of boards of education,
elected by local boards of education. At least two of such directors shall be
elected from each congressional district of the state;
(B) at least two directors shall be representatives of the state board of
education, appointed by the state board;
(C) (i) directors who are representatives of the senior high schools
which that are affiliated with a league shall be elected by the league;
(ii) the senior high schools which that are not affiliated with a league
shall be represented by at least one director;
(D) at least four directors shall be representatives of the middle/junior
middle and junior high schools, elected by the middle/junior middle and
junior high schools;
(E) at least one director shall be representative of and selected by
athletic administrators;
(F) at least one director shall be representative of and selected by
coaches;
(G) at least one director shall be representative of and selected by
speech communications educators;

HB 2176 4
(H) at least one director shall be representative of and selected by
music educators; and
(I) at least one director shall be representative of and selected by
scholars' bowl coaches.
(2) The directors appointed by the state board of education from the
public at-large prior to July 1, 2014, whose terms are set to expire after
July 1, 2014, may continue to serve on the board of directors until such
director's term expires. Upon the expiration of the term of any such
director, the governor shall appoint a successor member of the board of
directors. In the event of a vacancy or the expiration of the term of any
director appointed by the governor, the governor shall appoint a successor
member of the board of directors. Any person appointed by the governor
shall not be employed by any school affiliated with a league in the Kansas
state high school activities association, nor shall such person be a member
of the state board of education. The governor shall be provided a list of
those directors appointed pursuant to subsection (b)(1). The governor shall
make appointments pursuant to this subsection in order to attain, when
necessary, and insofar as possible, representation of ethnic minority groups
and both genders on the board of directors and to ensure that a resident
from each congressional district is appointed to the board of directors.
(3) All directors are limited to six consecutive years of service.
(c) (1) An executive board, which shall be responsible for the
administration, enforcement and interpretation of policy established by the
board of directors, shall be elected by the board of directors from its
membership, provided that a director shall serve at least one year as a
member of the board of directors prior to being elected to the executive
board.
(2) At least two members of the board of directors elected to the
executive board shall be directors appointed by the governor under
subsection (b)(2), provided such directors are eligible for election to the
executive board under this subsection. Members of the executive board
elected pursuant to this paragraph shall only be eligible to serve on the
executive board during the second, fourth and sixth years of such director's
term.
(3) Insofar asTo the extent possible, membership on the executive
board shall be representative of ethnic minority groups, both genders, and
all geographical areas of the state.
(d) (1) An appeal board, which shall be responsible for conducting
hearings provided for in K.S.A. 72-7118, and amendments thereto, shall be
elected as provided in this subsection. The appeal board shall consist of
eight members. The membership of the appeal board shall include:
(A) Four members who are board of education members, elected by
the boards of education of the member schools of the association; and

HB 2176 5
(B) four members who are school administrators, elected by the
member schools of the association.
(2) No member of the board of directors shall be eligible for election
to membership on the appeal board. All members of the appeal board are
limited to six consecutive years of service.
(e) The executive board is authorized to employ an executive director
and such other personnel as may be necessary to the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the functions and duties of the board of directors,
the executive board, and the appeal board. The executive director and all
other personnel, except custodial, clerical or maintenance personnel,
employed by the executive board pursuant to this subsection, shall file
written statements of substantial interests, as provided by K.S.A. 46-248
through 46-252, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 72-7114 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.